Tennessee statutes. Title 44 Animals And Animal Husbandry
Part 6

Chemical Capture

44-17-601. “Chemical capture” defined — Authorized drugs — Administration of drugs.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires, “chemical capture” means the capture of a dog or cat by means of sedation using approved drugs as provided in this part and appropriate drug administering equipment.

Chemical capture by certified animal chemical capture technicians shall only be effected by use of Telazol or such other drugs as may be determined by the board of veterinary medical examiners.

Drugs used for chemical capture shall only be administered by a licensed veterinarian, a licensed veterinary technician employed by and functioning under the direct supervision of a licensed veterinarian, or such other individuals qualified as certified animal chemical capture technicians as determined by the board of veterinary medical examiners pursuant to § 63-12-144.

With respect to certified animal chemical capture technicians, chemical capture shall be effected only in accordance with a written protocol and only when all other methods of capture have failed.

Acts 2008, ch. 805, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch 805, § 3 provided that the board of veterinary medical examiners is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Effective Dates. Acts 2008, ch. 805, § 4. January 1, 2009; provided, that for purposes of promulgating rules and regulations, the act shall take effect April 25, 2008.